Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-699
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Compressed Fuel Tax Act, the definitions found in sections 66-6,100 to 66-6,105 shall be used.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 3.